apertium-la-es.la.dix
    <pardef n="fidelita/s__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tis</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ti</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tem</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tes</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tum</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tibus</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tes</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tibus</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tes</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="fung/us__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>um</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orum</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="fin/is__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>em</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ibus</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ium</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ibus</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="corp/us__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ore</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oris</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ori</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oribus</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orum</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oribus</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ora</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ora</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ora</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="corpus"><i>corp</i><par n="corp/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="corpus Christi"><i>corp</i><par n="corp/us__n"/><p><l><b/>Christi</l><r><g><b/>Christi</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="finis"><i>fin</i><par n="fin/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="immortalis"><i>immortal</i><par n="fin/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fungus"><i>fung</i><par n="fung/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="activitas"><i>activita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="actuositas"><i>actuosita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="adversitas"><i>adversita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aequitas"><i>aequita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="authoritas"><i>authorita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="captivitas"><i>captivita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="competitivitas"><i>competitivita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="copiositas"><i>copiosita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="curiositas"><i>curiosita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="divinitas"><i>divinita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="excentricitas"><i>excentricita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fraternitas"><i>fraternita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="habilitas"><i>habilita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="homogeneitas"><i>homogeneita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="immortalitas"><i>immortalita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="indentitas"><i>indentita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="intensitas"><i>intensita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="multiplicitas"><i>multiplicita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nobilitas"><i>nobilita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="paritas"><i>parita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="profunditas"><i>profundita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="relativitas"><i>relativita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sensibilitas"><i>sensibilita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="singularitas"><i>singularita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="superioritas"><i>superiorita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="velocitas"><i>velocita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="acuitas"><i>acuita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="agilitas"><i>agilita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="amoenitas"><i>amoenita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="artificiositas"><i>artificiosita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="authenticitas"><i>authenticita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="caducitas"><i>caducita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="carnalitas"><i>carnalita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="celebritas"><i>celebrita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="civilitas"><i>civilita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="commoditas"><i>commodita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="conformitas"><i>conformita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="continuitas"><i>continuita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="credulitas"><i>credulita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="deitas"><i>deita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="disparitas"><i>disparita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="duplicitas"><i>duplicita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="extremitas"><i>extremita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fecunditas"><i>fecundita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="festivitas"><i>festivita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="garrulitas"><i>garrulita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gratuitas"><i>gratuita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="immobilitas"><i>immobilita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="incapacitas"><i>incapacita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="incorruptibilitas"><i>incorruptibilita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="infecunditas"><i>infecundita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="informitas"><i>informita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="iniquitas"><i>iniquita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="latinitas"><i>latinita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="liberalitas"><i>liberalita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mediocritas"><i>mediocrita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="modalitas"><i>modalita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mortalitas"><i>mortalita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="obscuritas"><i>obscurita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="placabilitas"><i>placabilita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="principalitas"><i>principalita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="prosperitas"><i>prosperita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="refrangibilitas"><i>refrangibilita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rusticitas"><i>rusticita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="serenitas"><i>serenita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sollemnitas"><i>sollemnita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sublimitas"><i>sublimita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="temeritas"><i>temerita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tranquillitas"><i>tranquillita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="universitas"><i>universita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vanitas"><i>vanita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="volubilitas"><i>volubilita</i><par n="fidelita/s__n"/></e>
